California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Acquire land for and construct, lease or otherwise acquire, furnish, refurnish, maintain or repair buildings for special or technical schools or institutes for instruction in the dramatic or theatrical arts, and related facilities, including, without limitation to, public auditoriums or playhouses and offstreet parking places for motor vehicles;

(b) Operate such schools or institutes and other related facilities, and, in the operation thereof, charge such fees as are necessary to defray the cost of instruction, issue certificates evidencing completion of the instruction taken to the satisfaction of the board, present theatrical and other entertainment to the public and charge admission thereto, and exercise any other power the board deems necessary and proper to promote the objects and purposes of such schools or institutes and their related facilities;

(c) Enter into an operating lease or sublease, without advertising for bids therefor, of such buildings, structures and facilities, or any thereof, with any nonprofit association or corporation for their maintenance, operation, and management, or any thereof, for such purposes and for a specified term, not to exceed 40 years, such lease or sublease to include provisions regarding manner of use as required by law and such other terms and conditions as the board sees fit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

5141.1.

A lease or sublease entered into pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5140 shall provide that the net revenue, if any, from the operation and use of the facilities, remaining after the payment of any expenses and costs for maintenance, operation, or management, payment of interest and principal upon any loans made to the nonprofit corporation or association for purposes of maintenance, operation, or management, or any other expenses, and after providing maintenance and operation reserves, shall be paid at least annually to the county. Notwithstanding Section 231 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all buildings, structures, and facilities, together with the land upon which they are situated, and so much of the surrounding land as is required for their use and occupation, operated by a nonprofit association or corporation pursuant to the operating lease or sublease, shall be exempt from taxation within the meaning of “charitable purposes” in subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. The lease or sublease shall provide that, upon its expiration and after payment or discharge of its indebtedness and liabilities, all of the assets of the nonprofit association or corporation shall be transferred to the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 569.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Parks [5150. - 5164.]

5150.

Any county or city may assist the State in acquiring any park, playground, recreational center, or beach to be used for recreational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5151.

Any county or city may donate, convey, and grant to the State any real property owned by it, or which it may acquire, for a park, playground, recreational center, or beach used for recreational purposes. It may use any part of its funds, including funds received by bequest, gift, donation, and those received in trust for the acquisition of such properties, as may be necessary to assist the State in acquiring any park, playground, recreational center, or beach for recreational purposes, to be cared for, maintained, and controlled under any agreement or arrangement authorized by article one of chapter one of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.

The board of supervisors or governing body of any county or city within which any park forming a part of the State park system is established, may relinquish any road, highway, or trail, or portion thereof, or right of way therefor, existing within the park, to the authority charged by law with the management and control of the park. Jurisdiction over any such road, highway, or trail shall vest in the park authority, upon the acceptance by it of the road, highway, trail, or right of way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5153.

Relinquishment to the park authority of any road, highway, trail, or right of way shall be by resolution of the board or governing body having jurisdiction, spread upon its minutes, after notice and hearing. A certified copy of the resolution, with the acceptance of the park authority endorsed thereon, may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the road, highway, or trail is located, and a certified copy shall be filed with the park authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5155.

The board of supervisors of any county may, by a unanimous vote, expend any portion of the moneys in any of the funds named in section 5156 for the payment of principal or interest, the redemption or purchase of bonds of the county or of a special assessment district within the county if special assessments have been or are to be levied for such payments, and the proceeds of the bonds have been used for the acquisition of lands or the improvement or maintenance of lands or public parks within the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5156.

Expenditures authorized by Section 5155, may be made from any one of the following funds:

(a) The general fund of the county.

(b) The proceeds of any county bond issue voted for the purpose of acquiring lands or improving or maintaining them as a public park within the county, or from any other fund available for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

5157.

Any county may purchase or lease, or obtain by gift, lands located in the county, or in other counties and may hold, improve, and maintain such lands for public parks, public beaches, public recreation areas or public boulevards.

Before land situated in another county may be so acquired and held, improved, and maintained, the consent by resolution of the board of supervisors of that county shall be obtained. Land acquired in conformity with the requirements of this section is subject to the jurisdiction, laws and ordinances of the acquiring county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 922.)
-------------------------------------------

5157.5.

Under such limitations and restrictions as are prescribed by law, and in addition to jurisdiction and powers otherwise conferred, boards of supervisors in their respective counties shall have jurisdiction and power to construct within the incorporated as well as the unincorporated area of the county works for the prevention of beach erosion or for the restoration of eroded beaches or both. Such work may be performed along any portion of the ocean front regardless of ownership of the adjacent upland. Before any such work is performed by a county within the incorporated area of any county, the consent of the governing body of such incorporated area shall first be obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1088.)
-------------------------------------------

5158.

The commissioners of any public park in this State may accept and receive donations and aid from individuals and corporations, and may receive legacies and bequests, and the moneys derived therefrom shall be a portion of the public funds belonging to the park commissioners, and are applicable under the direction of the park commissioners to the purposes of preserving and embellishing the parks under their respective management and control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5159.

If these funds at any time exceed the sums necessary for immediate expenditure on the park grounds, or if it is advisable to invest them and make them productive, the park commissioners may invest them or any portion, in interest-bearing bonds of the government of the United States, or the State of California, and the commissioners may use the interest and income. The commissioners may, if necessary, sell and dispose of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5160.

The board of supervisors of any county may by a four-fifths vote of the members use or dedicate for county highway purposes any portion of any county public park acquired in whole or in part with county funds or acquired through special assessment district proceedings conducted by such board of supervisors when public funds have been contributed to such district proceedings or for the payment or retirement of bonds or assessments thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

5161.

Whenever any county, city and county, city or the state owns land within the limits of any area designated as a state historical monument, it may, with the consent of the department, sell such land to, or exchange such land with, any other public, private, or former owner of land within the same area upon a determination by the state or other governmental agency that the sale or exchange of the land will facilitate the development of the historical monument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

5162.

Any beach or seashore recreation area owned, leased, operated, controlled, maintained or managed by a city or county which is open to the use of residents of such city or county shall be open to all members of the public upon the same terms, fees, charges and conditions as are applicable to the residents of such city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1594.)
-------------------------------------------

5163.

(a) No person shall initially be employed in connection with a park, playground, recreational center, or beach used for recreational purposes by a city or county in a position requiring contact with children, or as a food concessionaire or other licensed concessionaire in that area, unless the person produces or has on file with the city or county a certificate showing that within the last two years the person has been examined and has been found to be free of communicable tuberculosis.

(b) Thereafter, those employees who are skin test negative shall be required to undergo the foregoing examination at least once each four years for so long as the employee remains skin test negative. Once an employee has a documented positive skin test which has been followed by an X-ray, the foregoing examination is no longer required and a referral shall be made within 30 days of the examination to the local health officer to determine the need for followup care.

“Certificate” means a document signed by the examining physician and surgeon who is licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a notice from a public health agency or unit of the tuberculosis association which indicates freedom from active tuberculosis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 704, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5163.1.

The examination shall consist of an approved intradermal tuberculosis test, which, if positive, shall be followed by an X-ray of the lungs.

Nothing in Sections 5163 to 5163.2, inclusive, shall prevent the governing body of any city or county, upon recommendation of the local health officer, from establishing a rule requiring a more extensive or more frequent examination than required by Section 5163 and this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 704, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5163.2.

The X-ray film may be taken by a competent and qualified X-ray technician if the X-ray film is subsequently interpreted by a licensed physician and surgeon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 638.)
-------------------------------------------

5163.3.

The city or county shall maintain a file containing an up-to-date certificate for each person covered by Section 5163.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 638.)
-------------------------------------------

5163.4.

Nothing in Sections 5163 to 5163.3, inclusive, shall prevent the city or county from requiring more extensive or more frequent examinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 638.)
-------------------------------------------

5164.

(a) (1) A county, city, city and county, or special district shall not hire a person for employment, or hire a volunteer to perform services, at a county, city, city and county, or special district operated park, playground, recreational center, or beach used for recreational purposes, in a position having supervisory or disciplinary authority over a minor, if that person has been convicted of an offense specified in paragraph (2).

(2) (A) A violation or attempted violation of Section 220, 261.5, former Section 262, 273a, 273d, or 273.5 of the Penal Code, or a sex offense listed in Section 290 of the Penal Code, except for the offense specified in
 subdivision (d) of Section 243.4 of the Penal Code.

(B) A felony or misdemeanor conviction specified in subparagraph (C) within 10 years of the date of the employer’s request.

(C) A felony conviction that is over 10 years old, if the subject of the request was incarcerated within 10 years of the employer’s request, for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 207) of Title 8 of Part 1 of the Penal Code, Section 211 or 215 of the Penal Code, wherein it is charged and proved that the defendant personally used a deadly or dangerous weapon, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 12022 of the Penal Code, in the commission of that offense, Section 217.1 of the Penal Code, Section 236 of the Penal Code, an
 offense specified in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 240) of Title 8 of Part 1 of the Penal Code, or an offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, provided that a record of a misdemeanor conviction shall not be transmitted to the requester unless the subject of the request has a total of three or more misdemeanor convictions, or a combined total of three or more misdemeanor and felony convictions, for violations listed in this section within the 10-year period immediately preceding the employer’s request or has been incarcerated for any of those convictions within the preceding 10 years.

(b) (1) To give effect to this section, a county, city, city and county, or special district shall require each prospective employee or volunteer described in subdivision (a) to undergo a fingerprint-based state
 or national criminal history background check.

(2) A county, city, city and county, or special district shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state or national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. A fee shall not be charged to the local agency for requesting the state records of a prospective volunteer pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) A county, city, city and county, or special district may charge a prospective employee or volunteer described in subdivision (a) a fee to cover
 all of the county, city, city and county, or special district’s costs attributable to the requirements imposed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 27.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Municipal Park Control [5181. - 5199.]

5181.

All lands, parks, highways, and avenues in any city or city and county, which prior to March 14, 1889, were set apart by law for public parks and which have been placed under the management or control of a board of park commissioners, shall remain and continue to be public parks, subject to the management and control of the several boards of park commissioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5182.

Each board of park commissioners shall consist of three persons, who shall be appointed by the Governor.

They shall hold their offices for four years, respectively, and shall receive no compensation for their services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5183.

In case of a vacancy in the membership of the board, it shall be filled by an appointee of the remaining members of the board, for the unexpired term.

All vacancies caused by the expiration of the term of office of any member or by the failure or neglect to qualify of any person appointed by the Governor, shall be filled by the Governor.

Each member of each board shall be a freeholder and a resident of the city, or city and county, in which the board of which he is a member is to act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5184.

The Governor shall issue a commission to each commissioner appointed by him or her, and each commissioner shall, within 20 days after the receipt thereof, take and subscribe the oath of office prescribed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

5185.

Two members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and the concurrent action of two members is sufficient to enable the board to:

(a) Make any contracts pertaining to the park or parks under the control of the board.

(b) Draw and expend any money which has been appropriated or set apart for the support of the park or parks, or which constitutes any portion of the funds applicable to their support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5186.

Each board shall govern, manage, and direct the parks, avenues, and grounds which are placed under its care and charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5187.

It may employ and appoint superintendents, laborers, clerks or secretaries, attorneys, surveyors, and engineers, and it may engage and employ musicians for service in the park, and other officers and assistants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5188.

It may prescribe and fix the duties, authority, and compensation of its appointees and employees. It shall manage and disburse funds appropriated or provided for the support of the parks and grounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5189.

Moneys shall not be paid out of the treasury of any city, or city and county, except upon warrants duly signed by a majority of the board of park commissioners and audited by the auditor of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5190.

Every park commissioner who is interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract or work of any kind connected with the park or grounds under the control of the board of which he is a member is guilty of a felony.

Every person who knows or is informed of a violation of this section, shall forthwith report it to the Governor, who shall hear the allegations and proofs. If, after the hearing, the Governor is satisfied of the truth of the charge, he shall immediately remove the commissioner who has been guilty of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5191.

Each board shall on the first Monday of July of each year make to the Legislature of the State, and to the legislative body of the city in which the board is acting, a full report of its proceedings and a detailed statement of its receipts and expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5192.

Each board of park commissioners may let or lease any portion of the parks or grounds under its control, not exceeding one acre in extent, to any one person, until the grounds so leased are required for the improvement of such parks, or for public use as a park. The lease shall be unassignable. No portion may be leased to any street or other railroad company for a term exceeding three years.

All money realized from the leases shall be paid into the treasury of the city, or city and county, in which the parks are situated, and added to the funds appropriated or provided for the support of the parks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5193.

Each board may pass and adopt ordinances which are necessary for the regulation, use, and government of the parks and grounds under its supervision, not inconsistent with the laws of the State. These ordinances shall be published for ten days, Sunday excepted, in a daily newspaper to be selected by the board, published in the city or city and county in which the board is acting. Publication shall be commenced within five days after passage of the ordinance.

Every person who violates any published ordinance is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5194.

Prisoners over the age of 18 years, who have been sentenced to hard labor in any penal establishment of any city or city and county may, upon the request and requisition of the board of park commissioners, be put to work upon the parks and grounds which are under the control of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

5195.

Each board may accept donations and aid from any person or corporation, and legacies and bequests by the last wills of deceased persons, for the aid or improvement of the parks and grounds under the control of the board. All money derived by any board from donations, legacies, and bequests shall, unless otherwise provided by the terms of the gift, legacy, or bequest, be deposited in the treasury of the city or city and county and withdrawn and paid out in the same manner as money legally appropriated for the support and improvement of the parks and grounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5196.

If the money derived from gifts, bequests, or legacies at any time exceeds the sum necessary for immediate expenditure on the parks and grounds, or if it is advisable to invest all or a part of such funds in an interest-bearing or productive investment, the board may invest such money in interest-bearing bonds of the Government of the United States, or the State of California, or in obligations issued pursuant to the provisions of the Federal Home Loan Bank Act, approved July 22, 1932, as now or hereafter amended, or in obligations issued pursuant to Title 4 of the National Housing Act, approved June 27, 1934, as now or hereafter amended. Thereafter the board may sell and dispose of these securities, or change the form of the investment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

5199.

A board of park commissioners shall not in any year incur any debt or liability or expend any money beyond the amount legally applicable to the support, preservation, and improvement of the parks and grounds under the control of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Park and Boulevard Bonds [5301. - 5313.]

5301.

Any city or city and county may acquire and hold land for public parks, or public boulevards, or both, by purchase, or by condemnation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.

The land may be within the corporate limits of the city or city and county or conveniently adjacent. In either case it shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the municipality acquiring it, and to its laws, ordinances, rules, and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.

The legislative body of any city or city and county may, by ordinance, or in such manner as other municipal legislative acts are enacted by it, determine what lands are necessary and proper to be acquired for public parks or boulevards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5305.

The legislative body of the city or city and county may, by ordinance or in such manner as other municipal legislative acts are enacted by it, call an election and submit to the qualified electors of the municipality a proposition to issue bonds of the municipality, to a specified amount, the proceeds to be applied exclusively to the acquisition, maintenance, and improvement of its public parks, or boulevards, or both. The election shall be conducted, and the result determined substantially as are other local municipal elections of the municipality in which it is held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5306.

If at the election two-thirds of the qualified electors who vote assent to the issuance of the bonds, the city or city and county may, by ordinance, or in such manner as other municipal legislative acts are enacted by it, provide for the issuance of, and cause to be issued, its bonds to the amount specified and voted for.

The bonds shall mature and become due and payable at a time not exceeding 20 years, and shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding 8 percent a year, payable annually. Before or at the time of the issuance of the bonds, provision shall be made for the collection of an annual tax sufficient to pay the interest as it falls due, and to constitute a sinking fund to pay the principal at maturity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

5307.

The bonds shall be numbered consecutively from one upwards, and shall be issued in the order of their respective numbers, commencing with number one. There shall be attached coupons for the payment of the annual interest.

The bonds shall be known and designated either as the “park and boulevard,” or “park,” or “boulevard” bonds of the municipality issuing them. Each bond shall not exceed in the amount of its principal one thousand dollars, and may be in any smaller amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5308.

The bonds or any number issued shall be sold to the highest bidder, after advertised notice for sealed proposals. No bid of less than par value shall be accepted, nor shall any bonds be sold during any one year in excess of the actual expenditures incurred in that year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5309.

The money obtained from the sale of the bonds shall be kept in a separate fund, and shall be used exclusively for the acquisition, or maintenance, or improvement of the public parks or boulevards, or both, of the municipality issuing them, and for no other use or purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5310.

Whenever there is in the sinking fund an amount sufficient for the purpose, the legislative body of the municipality issuing the bonds, may, by ordinance or in such manner as other municipal legislative acts are enacted by it, cause notice to be given by advertisement, stating the amount in the sinking fund available for the redemption of the bonds, and inviting sealed proposals for the redemption, surrender, and cancellation of bonds, with interest, to the specified amount in the sinking fund. At the date designated in the notice the bids, if any, shall be opened and the bids offering to surrender bonds for the lowest sum, not more than par value, shall be accepted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5311.

If sufficient bids are not received to consume the money in the sinking fund, and a sum sufficient for the purpose still remains in the sinking fund, notice shall be given by advertisement for not less than thirty days, stating that there is an amount, to be specified in the notice, still remaining in the sinking fund to be applied to the redemption of the bonds with interest, having the highest numbers, specifying the numbers. If those bonds are not presented for redemption, surrender, and cancellation within the time specified in the notice, they shall thereafter cease to draw interest. The amount in the sinking fund shall be kept for their redemption when presented, but no more shall be paid than the amount of principal and interest due at the expiration of the time specified in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5312.

Any city or city and county availing itself of the provisions of this article, may, by ordinance or in such manner as other municipal legislative acts are enacted by it, prescribe further conditions and provisions for the issuance and sale of the bonds and for their redemption which are not inconsistent with the Constitution of this State, or the provisions of this article, or the charter or act of incorporation of the city or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5313.

All notices and advertisements provided for in this article shall be given by publication in a newspaper, if there is one published within the municipality; if there is none, then by posting in at least three public places within the municipality. When no other time is prescribed in this article, the legislative body of the municipality shall fix a reasonable time. Bonds issued pursuant to this article, and sold to purchasers in good faith, shall not be held to be invalid for any defect in any of the notices provided for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Municipal Park Improvement District Bonds [5350. - 5370.]

5350.

Any portion of a municipality incorporated under the laws of this State may be formed into a municipal park improvement district for the purpose of creating an indebtedness, to be represented by bonds of the district, the proceeds from the sale of which shall be used for the acquisition or construction of any public park improvement or work which such municipality is authorized by law to acquire or construct, pursuant to this article.

“Work” or “improvement” whether used singly or in combination mean and include any work or improvement for public park or recreation purposes together with the acquisition of property necessary and convenient therefor, as well as the construction, reconstruction and repair of all or any part of such work or improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5351.

Whenever a petition, verified by one or more persons and signed by not less than 10 percent of the qualified electors residing in the territory which is proposed to be formed into a municipal park improvement district, setting forth a general description of the improvement or work to be acquired or constructed and a general description of the exterior boundaries of such proposed district, shall have been filed in the office of the clerk of the legislative body of the city, and the genuineness of the signatures shall have been certified to by the city clerk, the legislative body may adopt an ordinance declaring its intention to call an election in the proposed district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified electors of the district the proposition of authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds of the district in the manner and for the purpose set forth in the ordinance of intention. The legislative body shall have power to change or modify the boundaries of the district and the nature, character or extent of the proposed public improvement or work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5352.

The ordinance of intention shall contain:

(a) An accurate description of the exterior boundaries of the proposed municipal park district;

(b) A general description of the improvement or work proposed to be acquired or constructed;

(c) An estimate of the cost of the proposed improvement or work, and an estimate of the incidental expense in connection therewith;

(d) A statement declaring the intention to call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters in the district the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district to pay the cost and expenses of the proposed improvement or work, and stating that a map showing the exterior boundaries of the district with relation to the territory immediately contiguous thereto, and a general description of the proposed improvement are on file in the office of the clerk of the legislative body of the city; which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the district;

(e) A statement of the date, hour and place fixed for the hearing of protests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5353.

The ordinance of intention shall be published in the city pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code. The ordinance, unless otherwise provided by charter of the municipality, shall take effect upon the completion of publication. In municipalities where no newspaper is published the ordinance shall be posted in three public places, and in case of posting notice the ordinance shall take effect two weeks after date of such posting of notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

5354.

Any person interested, objecting to the formation of the district, or to the extent of the district, or to the proposed improvement or work, may file a written protest, setting forth such objection, with the clerk of the legislative body at or before the time set for the hearing of the petition. The clerk of the legislative body shall endorse on each protest the date of its reception by him, and, at the time appointed for the hearing above provided for, shall present to the board all protests filed with him. The legislative body shall hear the protests at the time appointed or at any time to which the hearing may be adjourned, and pass upon the same, and its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5355.

If the protest is against the proposed work or improvement and the legislative body finds that the protest is made by the owners of more than one-half of the area of the property to be taxed for the work or improvement, and protests are not withdrawn so as to reduce the same to less than a majority, no further proceedings shall be taken for a period of one year from the date of the decision of the legislative body on the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5356.

If any protests are against the extent of the district or against the inclusion of property in the district, then the legislative body shall have power to make such changes in the boundaries of the proposed district as it shall find to be proper and advisable, and shall define and establish such boundaries, but such boundaries shall not include any territory which will not be benefited by the improvement or work. The legislative body shall not modify the boundaries except after notice of its intention given in the same manner as publication of the ordinance of intention to call the bond election, describing the proposed modification, and specifying a time for hearing objections to such modification, which time shall be at least 10 days after the publication of the notice, and the objections shall be heard and determined as are objections to the proposed improvement or work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5357.

If the legislative body has denied all protests, it may call an election to be held within the district described in the ordinance or resolution calling the election, which description shall conform with any changes in boundaries that may have been made under Section 5356, and provide for the submission of the proposition of incurring a debt by the issuance of bonds of the district for the purposes set forth in the ordinance of intention. The ordinance or resolution calling such election, shall also recite the objects and purposes for which the proposed indebtedness is to be incurred, the nature of the improvement or work, the estimated cost, the estimated cost of the incidental expense, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred and the rate of interest to be paid on such indebtedness; provided, however, that in its discretion the legislative body may recite in the ordinance or resolution a maximum rate of interest to be paid on such indebtedness not to exceed 8 per centum per annum, which rate when so recited shall not be exceeded in the issuance of bonds for such indebtedness; and said ordinance or resolution shall fix the date on which the election shall be held, the manner of holding the election and the manner of voting for or against the proposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

5358.

For the purposes of the bond election the legislative body shall establish in the ordinance, or resolution, one or more precincts within the boundaries of the district, designate a polling place and appoint one inspector, one judge and one clerk for each precinct. In all particulars not recited in such ordinance, or resolution, the election shall be held as provided by law for the holding of general municipal elections in such city. The ordinance, or resolution, ordering the holding of the election shall be published in the same manner as was the ordinance of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5359.

If at such election two-thirds of all the voters voting, vote in favor of incurring the bonded indebtedness, then the legislative body shall thereupon be authorized and empowered to issue the bonds of the district for the amount provided for in the ordinance or resolution calling the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5359.1.

The legislative body may divide the principal amount of any issue into two or more series and fix different dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of one series may be made payable at different times from those of any other series. The maturity of each series shall comply with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

5360.

The legislative body shall, subject to the provisions of this article, prescribe the form of the bonds, and of the interest coupons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5361.
